Hawaii statutes.
[§8-17] Caregiver Recognition Day.
The first Saturday of November shall be known and designated as "Caregiver
Recognition Day", in recognition of the very significant role that
caregivers play in support of Hawaii's elderly and persons with disabilities.
This day is not and shall not be construed as a state holiday.

As used in this section, "caregiver"
means any person who has undertaken the care, custody, or physical assistance
of an elderly or disabled person, including but not limited to compensated or
uncompensated family members or other relatives, or any person who has the
desire, or a legal, or contractual duty to care for the health, safety, and
welfare of an elderly or disabled person, including owners, operators,
employees, or staff of long-term care facilities and community home-based
institutions. [L 2008, c 6, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next